Utah statutes.
31A-16-110.   Enjoining violations -- Voting securities acquired in
violation of law or rule.
(1)  Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any insurer or any director,
officer, employee, or agent of an insurer has committed or is about to commit
a violation of this chapter or any rule or order issued by the commissioner
under this chapter, the commissioner may apply to the district court of the
county in which the principal office of the insurer is located, or if the
insurer has no principal office in this state, then to the Third District
Court of Salt Lake County, for an order enjoining the insurer or a director,
officer, employee, or agent of the insurer from the violation.  The
commissioner may also request other equitable relief which the nature of the
case and the interest of the insurer's policyholders, creditors, and
shareholders or the public require.
(2)  No security which is the subject of any agreement or arrangement
regarding acquisition, or which is acquired or to be acquired, in
contravention of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or order issued by
the commissioner under this chapter, may be voted at any shareholders'
meeting, or may be counted for quorum purposes.  Any action of shareholders
requiring the affirmative vote of a percentage of shares may be taken as
though those securities were not issued and outstanding.  However, no action
taken at that shareholders' meeting is invalidated by the voting of those
securities, unless the action would materially affect control of the insurer
or unless the district court has ordered that voting invalidates the action.
If an insurer or the commissioner has reason to believe that any security of
the insurer has been or is about to be acquired in contravention of the
provisions of this chapter or any rule or order issued by the commissioner
under this chapter, the insurer or the commissioner may apply to the Third
District Court of Salt Lake County or to the district court for the county in
which the insurer has its principal place of business, to enjoin any offer,
request, invitation, or agreement of acquisition which is made in
contravention of Section 31A-16-103 or any rule or order issued by the
commissioner under this chapter to enjoin the voting of that acquired
security.  This court order may also void any vote of that security if the
vote has already been cast at any meeting of shareholders, and the court may
grant other equitable relief which the nature of the case and the interests of
the insurer's policyholders, creditors, and shareholders or the public
require.
(3)  Upon the application of the insurer or the commissioner, if a person has
acquired or is proposing to acquire any voting securities in violation of this
chapter or of any rule or order issued by the commissioner under this chapter,
the Third District Court of Salt Lake County or the district court for the
county in which the insurer has its principal place of business may, upon the
notice which the court deems appropriate, seize or sequester any voting
securities of the insurer owned directly or indirectly by that person, and
issue orders with respect to that person and those securities which the court
considers appropriate to effectuate the provisions of this chapter.  For the
purposes of this chapter, the situs of the ownership of the securities of
domestic insurers is considered to be in this state.
